New Jersey, session 222, S2871.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A hospital service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1938, c.366 (C.17:48-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those hospital service corporation contracts in which the hospital service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 2.    a.  A medical service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1940, c.74 (C.17:48A-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those medical service corporation contracts in which the medical service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 3.    a.  A health service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1985, c.236 (C.17:48E-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those health service corporation contracts in which the health service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 4.    a.  An individual health insurance policy that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:26-1 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the policy. c.     This section shall apply to those individual health insurance policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 5.    a.  A group health insurance policy that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:27-26 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the policy. c.     This section shall apply to those group health insurance policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 6.    a.  An individual health benefits plan that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 7.    a.  A small employer health benefits plan that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 8.    a.  A health maintenance organization contract for health care services that is delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1973, c.337 (C.26:2J-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act, shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those contracts for health care services under which the health maintenance organization has reserved the right to change the schedule of charges for enrollee coverage. d.    As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 9.    a.  The State Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of this act that provides hospital and medical expense benefits shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 10.  a.  The School Employees Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of this act that provides hospital and medical expense benefits shall provide coverage for screening for Alzheimers disease and related disorders for a covered person who is 65 years of age or older. b.    The benefits shall be provided to the same extent as for any other condition under the contract. c.     As used in this section, "Alzheimer's disease and related disorders" means forms of dementia characterized by a general loss of intellectual abilities of sufficient severity to interfere with social or occupational functioning. 11. This act shall take effect on the 180th day following enactment, and shall apply to contracts delivered, issued, executed, or renewed on or after that date.